Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.0331

State combined fund drive program—Powers and duties of secretary of state.

To operate the Washington state combined fund drive program, the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may, but is not limited to the following:

(1) Raise money for charity, and reducing [reduce] the disruption to government caused by multiple fund drives;

(2) Establish criteria by which a public or private nonprofit organization may participate in the combined fund drive;

(3) Engage in or encouraging [encourage] fund-raising activities including the solicitation and acceptance of charitable gifts, grants, and donations from state employees, retired public employees, corporations, foundations, and other individuals for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the Washington state combined fund drive;

(4) Request the appointment of employees from state agencies and institutions of higher education to lead and manage workplace charitable giving campaigns within state government;

(5) Engage in educational activities, including classes, exhibits, seminars, workshops, and conferences, related to the basic purpose of the combined fund drive;

(6) Engage in appropriate fund-raising and advertising activities for the support of the administrative duties of the Washington state combined fund drive; and

(7) Charge an administrative fee to the beneficiaries of the Washington state combined fund drive to fund the administrative duties of the Washington state combined fund drive.

Activities of the Washington state combined fund drive shall not result in direct commercial solicitation of state employees, or a benefit or advantage that would violate one or more provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW. This section does not authorize individual state agencies to enter into contracts or partnerships unless otherwise authorized by law.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 10; 2010 c 101 s 2; 2003 c 205 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2010 c 101 s 2 and by 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 10, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.